Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-8,126
Repealed. Laws 2023, LB705, § 135. Operative date July 1, 2024. Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Master Teacher Program Act:

(1) Credentialing organization means a national nonprofit organization (a) approved by the State Department of Education, (b) the purpose of which is to establish high and rigorous standards in a broad range of educational areas for what accomplished teachers should know and be able to do, and (c) which issues credentials to teachers who demonstrate that they meet those standards; and

(2) Teacher means a person who holds a valid certificate to teach in Nebraska issued by the Commissioner of Education, who has been employed as a teacher for at least three years in a public or private school accredited or approved by the State Department of Education, and who continues to be employed as a teacher in such a school.

Laws 2000, LB 1399, § 9.